Utah statutes.
76-4-302.   Conviction of inchoate and principal offense or attempt and conspiracy to commit offense prohibited.

No person shall be convicted of both an inchoate and principal offense or of both an attempt to commit an offense and a conspiracy to commit the same offense.



Amended by Chapter 32, 1974 General Session

